Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1. Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control
§ 67-1-51.
Permits; distance regulations; prohibition on ownership of more than one package retailer’s permit; prohibition on ownership of additional permits by persons living in same household.

Permits which may be issued by the department shall be as follows:

Manufacturer’s permit.A manufacturer’s permit shall permit the manufacture, importation in bulk, bottling and storage of alcoholic liquor and its distribution and sale to manufacturers holding permits under this chapter in this state and to persons outside the state who are authorized by law to purchase the same, and to sell exclusively to the department.

Manufacturer’s permits shall be of the following classes:

Class 1. Distiller’s and/or rectifier’s permit, which shall authorize the holder thereof to operate a distillery for the production of distilled spirits by distillation or redistillation and/or to operate a rectifying plant for the purifying, refining, mixing, blending, flavoring or reducing in proof of distilled spirits and alcohol.

Class 2. Wine manufacturer’s permit, which shall authorize the holder thereof to manufacture, import in bulk, bottle and store wine or vinous liquor.

Class 3. Native wine producer’s permit, which shall authorize the holder thereof to produce, bottle, store and sell native wines.

Package retailer’s permit.Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and Section 67-1-52, a package retailer’s permit shall authorize the holder thereof to operate a store exclusively for the sale at retail in original sealed and unopened packages of alcoholic beverages, including native wines, not to be consumed on the premises where sold. Alcoholic beverages shall not be sold by any retailer in any package or container containing less than fifty (50) milliliters by liquid measure. A package retailer’s permit, with prior approval from the department, shall authorize the holder thereof to sample new product furnished by a manufacturer’s representative or his employees at the permitted place of business so long as the sampling otherwise complies with this chapter and applicable department regulations. Such samples may not be provided to customers at the permitted place of business. In addition to the sale at retail of packages of alcoholic beverages, the holder of a package retailer’s permit is authorized to sell at retail corkscrews, wine glasses, soft drinks, ice, juices, mixers and other beverages commonly used to mix with alcoholic beverages. Nonalcoholic beverages sold by the holder of a package retailer’s permit shall not be consumed on the premises where sold.

On-premises retailer’s permit. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, an on-premises retailer’s permit shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages, including native wines, for consumption on the licensed premises only; however, a patron of the permit holder may remove one (1) bottle of wine from the licensed premises if: (i) the patron consumed a portion of the bottle of wine in the course of consuming a meal purchased on the licensed premises; (ii) the permit holder securely reseals the bottle; (iii) the bottle is placed in a bag that is secured in a manner so that it will be visibly apparent if the bag is opened; and (iv) a dated receipt for the wine and the meal is available. Such a permit shall be issued only to qualified hotels, restaurants and clubs, and to common carriers with adequate facilities for serving passengers. In resort areas, whether inside or outside of a municipality, the department, in its discretion, may issue on-premises retailer’s permits to such establishments as it deems proper. An on-premises retailer’s permit when issued to a common carrier shall authorize the sale and serving of alcoholic beverages aboard any licensed vehicle while moving through any county of the state; however, the sale of such alcoholic beverages shall not be permitted while such vehicle is stopped in a county that has not legalized such sales. If an on-premises retailer’s permit is applied for by a common carrier operating solely in the water, such common carrier must, along with all other qualifications for a permit, (i) be certified to carry at least one hundred fifty (150) passengers and/or provide overnight accommodations for at least fifty (50) passengers and (ii) operate primarily in the waters within the State of Mississippi which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi and/or on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River.

Solicitor’s permit.A solicitor’s permit shall authorize the holder thereof to act as salesman for a manufacturer or wholesaler holding a proper permit, to solicit on behalf of his employer orders for alcoholic beverages, and to otherwise promote his employer’s products in a legitimate manner. Such a permit shall authorize the representation of and employment by one (1) principal only. However, the permittee may also, in the discretion of the department, be issued additional permits to represent other principals. No such permittee shall buy or sell alcoholic beverages for his own account, and no such beverage shall be brought into this state in pursuance of the exercise of such permit otherwise than through a permit issued to a wholesaler or manufacturer in the state.

Native wine retailer’s permit. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, a native wine retailer’s permit shall be issued only to a holder of a Class 3 manufacturer’s permit, and shall authorize the holder thereof to make retail sales of native wines to consumers for on-premises consumption or to consumers in originally sealed and unopened containers at an establishment located on the premises of or in the immediate vicinity of a native winery.

Temporary retailer’s permit. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, a temporary retailer’s permit shall permit the purchase and resale of alcoholic beverages, including native wines, during legal hours on the premises described in the temporary permit only.

Temporary retailer’s permits shall be of the following classes:

Class 1. A temporary one-day permit may be issued to bona fide nonprofit civic or charitable organizations authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages, including native wine, for consumption on the premises described in the temporary permit only. Class 1 permits may be issued only to applicants demonstrating to the department, by a statement signed under penalty of perjury submitted ten (10) days prior to the proposed date or such other time as the department may determine, that they meet the qualifications of Sections 67-1-11, 67-1-37, 67-1-51(2) and (3), 67-1-55, 67-1-57 (excluding paragraph (e)) and 67-1-59. Class 1 permittees shall obtain all alcoholic beverages from package retailers located in the county in which the temporary permit is issued. Alcoholic beverages remaining in stock upon expiration of the temporary permit may be returned by the permittee to the package retailer for a refund of the purchase price upon consent of the package retailer or may be kept by the permittee exclusively for personal use and consumption, subject to all laws pertaining to the illegal sale and possession of alcoholic beverages. The department, following review of the statement provided by the applicant and the requirements of the applicable statutes and regulations, may issue the permit.

Class 2. A temporary permit, not to exceed seventy (70) days, may be issued to prospective permittees seeking to transfer a permit authorized in paragraph (c) of this subsection. A Class 2 permit may be issued only to applicants demonstrating to the department, by a statement signed under the penalty of perjury, that they meet the qualifications of Sections 67-1-5(l), (m), (n), (o), (p) or (q), 67-1-37, 67-1-51(2) and (3), 67-1-55, 67-1-57 and 67-1-59. The department, following a preliminary review of the statement provided by the applicant and the requirements of the applicable statutes and regulations, may issue the permit.

Class 2 temporary permittees must purchase their alcoholic beverages directly from the department or, with approval of the department, purchase the remaining stock of the previous permittee. If the proposed applicant of a Class 1 or Class 2 temporary permit falsifies information contained in the application or statement, the applicant shall never again be eligible for a retail alcohol beverage permit and shall be subject to prosecution for perjury.

Class 3. A temporary one-day permit may be issued to a retail establishment authorizing the complimentary distribution of wine, including native wine, to patrons of the retail establishment at an open house or promotional event, for consumption only on the premises described in the temporary permit. A Class 3 permit may be issued only to an applicant demonstrating to the department, by a statement signed under penalty of perjury submitted ten (10) days before the proposed date or such other time as the department may determine, that it meets the qualifications of Sections 67-1-11, 67-1-37, 67-1-51(2) and (3), 67-1-55, 67-1-57 (excluding paragraph (e)) and 67-1-59. A Class 3 permit holder shall obtain all alcoholic beverages from the holder(s) of a package retailer’s permit located in the county in which the temporary permit is issued. Wine remaining in stock upon expiration of the temporary permit may be returned by the Class 3 temporary permit holder to the package retailer for a refund of the purchase price, with consent of the package retailer, or may be kept by the Class 3 temporary permit holder exclusively for personal use and consumption, subject to all laws pertaining to the illegal sale and possession of alcoholic beverages. The department, following review of the statement provided by the applicant and the requirements of the applicable statutes and regulations, may issue the permit. No retailer may receive more than twelve (12) Class 3 temporary permits in a calendar year. A Class 3 temporary permit shall not be issued to a retail establishment that either holds a merchant permit issued under paragraph (l) of this subsection, or holds a permit issued under Chapter 3, Title 67, Mississippi Code of 1972, authorizing the holder to engage in the business of a retailer of light wine or beer.

Caterer’s permit. A caterer’s permit shall permit the purchase of alcoholic beverages by a person engaging in business as a caterer and the resale of alcoholic beverages by such person in conjunction with such catering business. No person shall qualify as a caterer unless forty percent (40%) or more of the revenue derived from such catering business shall be from the serving of prepared food and not from the sale of alcoholic beverages and unless such person has obtained a permit for such business from the Department of Health. A caterer’s permit shall not authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages on the premises of the person engaging in business as a caterer; however, the holder of an on-premises retailer’s permit may hold a caterer’s permit. When the holder of an on-premises retailer’s permit or an affiliated entity of the holder also holds a caterer’s permit, the caterer’s permit shall not authorize the service of alcoholic beverages on a consistent, recurring basis at a separate, fixed location owned or operated by the caterer, on-premises retailer or affiliated entity and an on-premises retailer’s permit shall be required for the separate location. All sales of alcoholic beverages by holders of a caterer’s permit shall be made at the location being catered by the caterer, and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, such sales may be made only for consumption at the catered location. The location being catered may be anywhere within a county or judicial district that has voted to come out from under the dry laws or in which the sale, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized by law. Such sales shall be made pursuant to any other conditions and restrictions which apply to sales made by on-premises retail permittees. The holder of a caterer’s permit or his employees shall remain at the catered location as long as alcoholic beverages are being sold pursuant to the permit issued under this paragraph (g), and the permittee shall have at the location the identification card issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the department. No unsold alcoholic beverages may be left at the catered location by the permittee upon the conclusion of his business at that location. Appropriate law enforcement officers and Alcoholic Beverage Control Division personnel may enter a catered location on private property in order to enforce laws governing the sale or serving of alcoholic beverages.

Research permit. A research permit shall authorize the holder thereof to operate a research facility for the professional research of alcoholic beverages. Such permit shall authorize the holder of the permit to import and purchase limited amounts of alcoholic beverages from the department or from importers, wineries and distillers of alcoholic beverages for professional research.

Alcohol processing permit. An alcohol processing permit shall authorize the holder thereof to purchase, transport and possess alcoholic beverages for the exclusive use in cooking, processing or manufacturing products which contain alcoholic beverages as an integral ingredient. An alcohol processing permit shall not authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages on the premises of the person engaging in the business of cooking, processing or manufacturing products which contain alcoholic beverages. The amounts of alcoholic beverages allowed under an alcohol processing permit shall be set by the department.

Hospitality cart permit. A hospitality cart permit shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages from a mobile cart on a golf course that is the holder of an on-premises retailer’s permit. The alcoholic beverages sold from the cart must be consumed within the boundaries of the golf course.

Special service permit. A special service permit shall authorize the holder to sell commercially sealed alcoholic beverages to the operator of a commercial or private aircraft for en route consumption only by passengers. A special service permit shall be issued only to a fixed-base operator who contracts with an airport facility to provide fueling and other associated services to commercial and private aircraft.

Merchant permit. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, a merchant permit shall be issued only to the owner of a spa facility, an art studio or gallery, or a cooking school, and shall authorize the holder to serve complimentary by the glass wine only, including native wine, at the holder’s spa facility, art studio or gallery, or cooking school. A merchant permit holder shall obtain all wine from the holder of a package retailer’s permit.

Temporary alcoholic beverages charitable auction permit. A temporary permit, not to exceed five (5) days, may be issued to a qualifying charitable nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The permit shall authorize the holder to sell alcoholic beverages for the limited purpose of raising funds for the organization during a live or silent auction that is conducted by the organization and that meets the following requirements: (i) the auction is conducted in an area of the state where the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized; (ii) if the auction is conducted on the premises of an on-premises retailer’s permit holder, then the alcoholic beverages to be auctioned must be stored separately from the alcoholic beverages sold, stored or served on the premises, must be removed from the premises immediately following the auction, and may not be consumed on the premises; (iii) the permit holder may not conduct more than two (2) auctions during a calendar year; (iv) the permit holder may not pay a commission or promotional fee to any person to arrange or conduct the auction.

Event venue retailer’s permit. An event venue retailer’s permit shall authorize the holder thereof to purchase and resell alcoholic beverages, including native wines, for consumption on the premises during legal hours during events held on the licensed premises if food is being served at the event by a caterer who is not affiliated with or related to the permittee. The caterer must serve at least three (3) entrees. The permit may only be issued for venues that can accommodate two hundred (200) persons or more. The number of persons a venue may accommodate shall be determined by the local fire department and such determination shall be provided in writing and submitted along with all other documents required to be provided for an on-premises retailer’s permit. The permittee must derive the majority of its revenue from event-related fees, including, but not limited to, admission fees or ticket sales for live entertainment in the building. “Event-related fees” do not include alcohol, beer or light wine sales or any fee which may be construed to cover the cost of alcohol, beer or light wine. This determination shall be made on a per event basis. An event may not last longer than two (2) consecutive days per week.

Temporary theatre permit. A temporary theatre permit, not to exceed five (5) days, may be issued to a charitable nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code and owns or operates a theatre facility that features plays and other theatrical performances and productions. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the permit shall authorize the holder to sell alcoholic beverages, including native wines, to patrons of the theatre during performances and productions at the theatre facility for consumption during such performances and productions on the premises of the facility described in the permit. A temporary theatre permit holder shall obtain all alcoholic beverages from package retailers located in the county in which the permit is issued. Alcoholic beverages remaining in stock upon expiration of the temporary theatre permit may be returned by the permittee to the package retailer for a refund of the purchase price upon consent of the package retailer or may be kept by the permittee exclusively for personal use and consumption, subject to all laws pertaining to the illegal sale and possession of alcoholic beverages.

Charter ship operator’s permit. Subject to the provisions of this paragraph (p), a charter ship operator’s permit shall authorize the holder thereof and its employees to serve, monitor, store and otherwise control the serving and availability of alcoholic beverages to customers of the permit holder during private charters under contract provided by the permit holder. A charter ship operator’s permit shall authorize such action by the permit holder and its employees only as to alcoholic beverages brought onto the permit holder’s ship by customers of the permit holder as part of such a private charter. All such alcoholic beverages must be removed from the charter ship at the conclusion of each private charter. A charter ship operator’s permit shall not authorize the permit holder to sell, charge for or otherwise supply alcoholic beverages to customers, except as authorized in this paragraph (p). For the purposes of this paragraph (p), “charter ship operator” means a common carrier that (i) is certified to carry at least one hundred fifty (150) passengers and/or provide overnight accommodations for at least fifty (50) passengers, (ii) operates only in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, and (iii) provides charters under contract for tours and trips in such waters.

Distillery retailer’s permit. The holder of a Class 1 manufacturer’s permit may obtain a distillery retailer’s permit. A distillery retailer’s permit shall authorize the holder thereof to sell at retail alcoholic beverages by the sealed and unopened bottle from a retail location at the distillery for off-premises consumption. The holder may only sell product manufactured by the manufacturer at the distillery described in the permit. The holder shall not sell at retail more than ten percent (10%) of the alcoholic beverages produced annually at its distillery. The holder shall not make retail sales of more than two and twenty-five one-hundredths (2.25) liters, in the aggregate, of the alcoholic beverages produced at its distillery to any one (1) individual for consumption off the premises of the distillery within a twenty-four-hour period. The hours of sale shall be the same as those hours for package retailers under this chapter. The holder of a distillery retailer’s permit is not required to purchase the alcoholic beverages authorized to be sold by this paragraph from the department’s liquor distribution warehouse; however, if the holder does not purchase the alcoholic beverages from the department’s liquor distribution warehouse, the holder shall pay to the department all taxes, fees and surcharges on the alcoholic beverages that are imposed upon the sale of alcoholic beverages shipped by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. In addition to alcoholic beverages, the holder of a distillery retailer’s permit may sell at retail promotional products from the same retail location, including shirts, hats, glasses, and other promotional products customarily sold by alcoholic beverage manufacturers.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, retail permittees may hold more than one (1) retail permit, at the discretion of the department.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no authority shall be granted to any person to manufacture, sell or store for sale any intoxicating liquor as specified in this chapter within four hundred (400) feet of any church, school, kindergarten or funeral home. However, within an area zoned commercial or business, such minimum distance shall be not less than one hundred (100) feet.

A church or funeral home may waive the distance restrictions imposed in this subsection in favor of allowing issuance by the department of a permit, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, to authorize activity relating to the manufacturing, sale or storage of alcoholic beverages which would otherwise be prohibited under the minimum distance criterion. Such waiver shall be in written form from the owner, the governing body, or the appropriate officer of the church or funeral home having the authority to execute such a waiver, and the waiver shall be filed with and verified by the department before becoming effective.

The distance restrictions imposed in this subsection shall not apply to the sale or storage of alcoholic beverages at a bed and breakfast inn listed in the National Register of Historic Places or to the sale or storage of alcoholic beverages in a historic district that is listed in the National Register of Historic Places, is a qualified resort area and is located in a municipality having a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the latest federal decennial census.

No person, either individually or as a member of a firm, partnership, limited liability company or association, or as a stockholder, officer or director in a corporation, shall own or control any interest in more than one (1) package retailer’s permit, nor shall such person’s spouse, if living in the same household of such person, any relative of such person, if living in the same household of such person, or any other person living in the same household with such person own any interest in any other package retailer’s permit.

In addition to any other authority granted under this section, the holder of a permit issued under subsection (1)(c), (e), (f), (g), (l), (n) and/or (o) of this section may sell or otherwise provide alcoholic beverages and/or wine to a patron of the permit holder in the manner authorized in the permit and the patron may remove an open glass, cup or other container of the alcoholic beverage and/or wine from the licensed premises and may possess and consume the alcoholic beverage or wine outside of the licensed premises if: (i) the licensed premises is located within a leisure and recreation district created under Section 67-1-101 and (ii) the patron remains within the boundaries of the leisure and recreation district while in possession of the alcoholic beverage or wine.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to allow a person to bring any alcoholic beverages into a permitted premises except to the extent otherwise authorized by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10265-18, 10265-19, 10265-26; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, §§ 18, 19, 26; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 18; Laws, 1988, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 383, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 574, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 538, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 8; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 48, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 465, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 566, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 471, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after April 13, 2018.

§ 67-1-52.
Holder of package retailer’s permit authorized to conduct tasting or sampling events subject to certain conditions.

A package retailer’s permit issued under Section 67-1-51(b) shall, with prior written approval from the department, authorize tasting or sampling events to be conducted at the package retailer’s permitted place of business during which tastes or samples of alcoholic beverages may be offered or served to consumers at no cost. During a tasting or sampling event authorized by this section, limited amounts of alcoholic beverages may be consumed on the permitted place of business. A tasting or sampling event shall not authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the permitted place of business, but shall only authorize the limited consumption of alcoholic beverages at the permitted place of business for the sole purpose of tasting or sampling various alcoholic beverages. A tasting or sampling event shall be conducted completely within an area that is cordoned off by barriers clearly separating the event from the point of sale of any alcoholic beverage and may last not longer than four (4) hours. No one under twenty-one (21) years of age may participate in a tasting or sampling event and a sign indicating this shall be placed in a clearly visible location at the entrance to the area where the tasting or sampling event will be conducted. No food may be served or sold at a tasting or sampling event. Each sample of wine served at the event shall not exceed one and one-fourth (1-1/4) ounces and no more than a cumulative total of five (5) ounces of wine may be dispensed to any one (1) person during a tasting or sampling event. Each sample of a distilled spirit served at the event shall not exceed one-fourth (1/4) of an ounce and no more than a cumulative total of one (1) ounce of distilled spirits may be dispensed to any one (1) person during a tasting or sampling event. All product tasted or sampled at the event must be provided by the package retailer from its inventory. Such product cannot be sample product provided by a manufacturer and must have been purchased from the department warehouse or from a licensed wholesaler. Only employees of the package retailer may serve any product for tasting or sampling at the event. Tickets for a tasting or sampling event shall not be sold in the permitted place of business or any other location. The holder of a tasting or sampling event shall keep an accurate accounting of the various alcoholic beverages and amounts consumed at each tasting or sampling event and must provide a copy of the accounting to the department within ten (10) days of completion of the event. The holder of a package retailer’s permit may conduct not more than one (1) event in a three-month period.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 516, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 329, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 67-1-53.
Application for permit; notice of application.

Application for permits shall be in such form and shall contain such information as shall be required by the regulations of the commission; however, no regulation of the commission shall require personal financial information from any officer of a corporation applying for an on-premises retailer’s permit to sell alcoholic beverages unless such officer owns ten percent (10%) or more of the stock of such corporation.

Every applicant for each type of permit authorized by Section 67-1-51 shall give notice of such application by publication for two (2) consecutive issues in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or town in which applicant’s place of business is located. However, in instances where no newspaper is published in the city or town, then the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the applicant’s business is located. If no newspaper is published in the county, the notice shall be published in a qualified newspaper which is published in the closest neighboring county and circulated in the county of applicant’s residence. The notice shall be printed in ten-point black face type and shall set forth the type of permit to be applied for, the exact location of the place of business, the name of the owner or owners thereof, and if operating under an assumed name, the trade name together with the names of all owners, and if a corporation, the names and titles of all officers. The cost of such notice shall be borne by the applicant.

Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-19; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 19; Laws, 1993, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 21; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 67-1-55.
Applicants for permits must disclose persons financially interested in business; penalty.

No permit of any type shall be issued by the commission until the applicant has first filed with the commission a sworn statement disclosing all persons who are financially involved in the operation of the business for which the permit is sought. If an applicant is an individual, he will swear that he owns one hundred percent (100%) of the business for which he is seeking a permit. If the applicant is a partnership, all partners and their addresses shall be disclosed and the extent of their interest in the partnership shall be disclosed. If the applicant is a corporation, the total stock in the corporation shall be disclosed and each shareholder and his address and the amount of stock in the corporation owned by him shall be disclosed. If the applicant is a limited liability company, each member and their addresses shall be disclosed and the extent of their interest in the limited liability company shall be disclosed. If the applicant is a trust, the trustee and all beneficiaries and their addresses shall be disclosed. If the applicant is a combination of any of the above, all information required to be disclosed above shall be required.

All the disclosures shall be in writing and kept on file at the commission’s office and shall be available to the public.

Every applicant must, when applying for a renewal of his permit, disclose any change in the ownership of the business or any change in the beneficiaries of the income from the business.

Any person who willfully fails to fully disclose the information required by this section, or who gives false information, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined a sum not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both, and the person or applicant shall never again be eligible for any permit pertaining to alcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-20; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 20; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 67-1-57.
Qualification of applicants.

Before a permit is issued the department shall satisfy itself:

That the applicant, if an individual, or if a partnership, each of the members of the partnership, or if a corporation, each of its principal officers and directors, or if a limited liability company, each member of the limited liability company, is of good moral character and, in addition, enjoys a reputation of being a peaceable, law-abiding citizen of the community in which he resides, and is generally fit for the trust to be reposed in him, is not less than twenty-one (21) years of age, and has not been convicted of a felony in any state or federal court.

That, except in the case of an application for a solicitor’s permit, the applicant is the true and actual owner of the business for which the permit is desired, and that he intends to carry on the business authorized for himself and not as the agent of any other person, and that he intends to superintend in person the management of the business or that he will designate a manager to manage the business for him. All managers must be approved by the department prior to completing any managerial tasks on behalf of the permittee and must possess all of the qualifications required of a permittee; however, a felony conviction, other than a crime of violence, does not automatically disqualify a person from being approved as a manager if the person was released from incarceration at least three (3) years prior to application for approval as a manager. A felony conviction, other than a crime of violence, may be considered by the department in determining whether all other qualifications are met.

That the applicant for a package retailer’s permit, if an individual, is a resident of the State of Mississippi. If the applicant is a partnership, each member of the partnership must be a resident of the state. If the applicant is a limited liability company, each member of the limited liability company must be a resident of the state. If the applicant is a corporation, the designated manager of the corporation must be a resident of the state.

That the place for which the permit is to be issued is an appropriate one considering the character of the premises and the surrounding neighborhood.

That the place for which the permit is to be issued is within the corporate limits of an incorporated municipality or qualified resort area or club which comes within the provisions of this chapter.

That the applicant is not indebted to the state for any taxes, fees or payment of penalties imposed by any law of the State of Mississippi or by any rule or regulation of the commission.

That the applicant is not in the habit of using alcoholic beverages to excess and is not physically or mentally incapacitated, and that the applicant has the ability to read and write the English language.

That the commission does not believe and has no reason to believe that the applicant will sell or knowingly permit any agent, servant or employee to unlawfully sell liquor in a dry area or in any other manner contrary to law.

That the applicant is not residentially domiciled with any person whose permit or license has been cancelled for cause within the twelve (12) months next preceding the date of the present application for a permit.

That the commission has not, in the exercise of its discretion which is reserved and preserved to it, refused to grant permits under the restrictions of this section, as well as under any other pertinent provision of this chapter.

That there are not sufficient legal reasons to deny a permit on the ground that the premises for which the permit is sought has previously been operated, used or frequented for any purpose or in any manner that is lewd, immoral or offensive to public decency. In the granting or withholding of any permit to sell alcoholic beverages at retail, the commission in forming its conclusions may give consideration to any recommendations made in writing by the district or county attorney or county, circuit or chancery judge of the county, or the sheriff of the county, or the mayor or chief of police of an incorporated city or town wherein the applicant proposes to conduct his business and to any recommendations made by representatives of the commission.

That the applicant and the applicant’s key employees, as determined by the commission, do not have a disqualifying criminal record. In order to obtain a criminal record history check, the applicant shall submit to the commission a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for each person for whom the records check is required. The commission shall forward the fingerprints to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. Costs for processing the set or sets of fingerprints shall be borne by the applicant. The commission shall not deny employment to an employee of the applicant prior to the identification of a disqualifying record or other disqualifying information.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 23; Laws, 1968, ch. 591, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 494, § 1, Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 10; Laws, 2016, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 67-1-59.
“Applicant” defined.

Where the word “applicant” is used in Section 67-1-57 or in Sections 67-1-51, 67-1-53, 67-1-55 and 67-1-63, it shall also mean and include each member of a partnership, limited liability company or association and all officers and the owner or owners of the majority of the corporate stock of a corporation, as of the date of the application.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 23; Laws, 1968, ch. 591, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 67-1-61.
Validity, contents and display of permits.

All permits issued by the commission shall expire twelve months from date of issuance, and no permit shall be issued for a period longer than one year. Each permit shall state a class to which it belongs, the name of the permittee, the address of the premises for which granted, and the date of its expiration. All permits issued shall at all times be prominently displayed on the premises for which issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-21; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 21; ch. 649, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1966.